Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2469.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Human trafficking employee education study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The human trafficking employee education study committee is established and consists of the following members: 1. Two members of the house of representatives who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who are from different political parties. 2. Two members of the senate who are appointed by the president of the senate and who are from different political parties. 3. One member from the governor's council to combat human trafficking in Arizona who is appointed by the governor. 4. The attorney general or the attorney general's designee. 5. The director of the department of public safety or the director's designee. 6. The director of the department of emergency and military affairs or the director's designee. 7. One member who is from a chamber of commerce of a county with a population of more than four million persons and who is appointed by the governor. 8. One member who is from a chamber of commerce of a county with more than one million persons but less than four million persons and who is appointed by the governor. 9. One member who is from the greater Phoenix economic council and who is appointed by the governor. 10. One member who is from the office of sex trafficking intervention research at Arizona state university and who is appointed by the governor. 11. One member who is currently employed in academia, who holds a doctorate degree, who conducts research on human trafficking or identifying victims of human trafficking and who is appointed by the governor. 12. One member who has practical experience with human trafficking and who is appointed by the governor. 13. One member who is a licensed health care provider in this state, who has experience treating victims of human trafficking and who is appointed by the governor. 14. One member who is a licensed social worker, who works in a middle or high school and who is appointed by the governor. 15. One member who is a certified peace officer with experience in human trafficking and who is appointed by the governor. 16. One member who is from a tribal community. B. The members of the board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson. C. The house of representatives shall provide the committee with administrative support. D. The members of the committee are eligible to receive reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. E. The study committee shall: 1. Meet a minimum of two times or more frequently at the request of the chairperson or vice chairperson. 2. Evaluate options and methods of training retail and lodging business employees on how to identify and respond to possible victims of human trafficking in both urban and rural areas. F. On or before June 30, 2028, the committee shall submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations for educating retail and lodging businesses about human trafficking to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. G. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2028.